Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7621
Recapture of funds.

If the Department of Health and Human Services determines that services are not being delivered in accordance with the contract, the department may seek to recapture all or a portion of funds expended.

Laws 1998, LB 1070, § 17;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 61;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 684.